Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.110

Jury fee part of taxable costs.

The jury fee paid by the party demanding a trial by jury shall be a part of the taxable costs in such action.

[ 1961 c 304 s 3; 1903 c 43 s 2; RRS s 317.]